Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB769.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6143. Safe storage of firearm when not in use.(a) Storage requirements.--A person who owns a firearm shall secure the firearm:(1) with a device that, if installed on a firearm and secured by means of a key or a mechanical, electronic or electromechanical combination lock, prevents the firearm from being discharged without first deactivating or removing the device;(2) with a locking mechanism incorporated into the design of the firearm that prevents discharge of the firearm 123456789101112131415161718 by an individual who does not have access to the key or other device designed to unlock the mechanism; or(3) in a securely locked box or container or a location that a reasonable person would believe to be secure.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply if a person carries a firearm:(1) on the person's body; or(2) within close enough proximity to the person's body that the person is able to retrieve and use the firearm as if the firearm was on the person's body.(c) Penalties.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits:(1) A summary offense with no term of imprisonment if the offense is a first offense.(2) A misdemeanor of the third degree if the offense is a second or subsequent offense.(3) A felony of the third degree if:(i) another person takes possession of the firearm; and(ii) the firearm is used in the commission of a crime or used in an event that results in the injury or death of another person.(d) Defenses.--It shall be a defense to prosecution under this section if any of the following apply:(1) The firearm was secured in a manner described under subsection (a).(2) The firearm was obtained as a result of an unlawful entry by any person.(3) An injury resulted from a target or sport shooting accident or hunting accident.20250SB0769PN0828 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Possession of the firearm is incidental to the performance of the official duties of the United States Armed Forces, the Pennsylvania National Guard or the personnel of a Federal, State or local law enforcement agency.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0769PN0828 - 3 - 12345